apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="п/ень__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l>ень</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ень</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ня</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ню</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нём</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ні</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ні</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ні</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нёў</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ням</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нямі</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нях</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="партфэл/ь__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg3"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ем</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яў</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ям</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ямі</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ях</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="студзен/ь__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg3"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ем</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="лют/ы__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg4"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="сакавік__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg1"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="верас/ень__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l>ень</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ень</l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg6"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="снеж/ань__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l>ань</l><r>ань<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ань</l><r>ань<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ань<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nmsg6"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="тра/вень__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l>вень</l><r>вень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ўня</l><r>вень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ўню</l><r>вень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вень</l><r>вень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ўнем</l><r>вень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ўні</l><r>вень<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/год__n_m_nn"> <!-- FIXME: check -->
      <e><p><l>год</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>год</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>года</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>году</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>годзе</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>годзе</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>годам</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>гады</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>гады</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>гадоў</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>летаў</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>год</l><r>год<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="станцы/я__n_f_nn">
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яй</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яў</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ям</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ямі</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ях</l><r>я<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="мар/а__n_f_nn">
      <e><p><l>а</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ай</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nfpl1"/></e>
      <e><p><l>аў</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="сцян/а__n_f_nn">
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nfsg1"/></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="BASE__nfpl1"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="студзень"><i>студзен</i><par n="студзен/ь__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="люты"><i>лют</i><par n="лют/ы__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сакавік"><i>сакавік</i><par n="сакавік__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="красавік"><i>красавік</i><par n="сакавік__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="травень"><i>тра</i><par n="тра/вень__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="чэрвень"><i>чэрвен</i><par n="студзен/ь__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ліпень"><i>ліпен</i><par n="студзен/ь__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="жнівень"><i>жні</i><par n="тра/вень__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="верасень"><i>верас</i><par n="верас/ень__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="кастрычнік"><i>кастрычнік</i><par n="сакавік__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="снежань"><i>снеж</i><par n="снеж/ань__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="пень"><i>п</i><par n="п/ень__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="партфэль"><i>партфэл</i><par n="партфэл/ь__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="аўтомабіль"><i>аўтомабіл</i><par n="партфэл/ь__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="станцыя"><i>станцы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="гісторыя"><i>гісторы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="тэрыторыя"><i>тэрыторы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="функцыя"><i>функцы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="федэрацыя"><i>федэрацы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="традыцыя"><i>традыцы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="дынастыя"><i>дынасты</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="правінцыя"><i>правінцы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="адукацыя"><i>адукацы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="рэвалюцыя"><i>рэвалюцы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="партыя"><i>парты</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="арганізацыя"><i>арганізацы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="імперыя"><i>імперы</i><par n="станцы/я__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="пара"><i>пар</i><par n="мар/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="мара"><i>мар</i><par n="мар/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="каша"><i>каш</i><par n="мар/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="вежа"><i>веж</i><par n="мар/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="раніца"><i>раніц</i><par n="мар/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ануча"><i>ануч</i><par n="мар/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="мова"><i>мов</i><par n="мар/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сцяна"><i>сцян</i><par n="сцян/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="галава"><i>галав</i><par n="сцян/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сасна"><i>сасн</i><par n="сцян/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="год"><i></i><par n="/год__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="вуліца"><i>вуліц</i><par n="мар/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="рука"><i>рук</i><par n="сцян/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
